Hawaii statutes.
[§291E-47] Failure to surrender number
plates. Any person who has had the person's motor vehicle registration
revoked pursuant to this part and subsequently fails to comply with an order to
surrender all motor vehicle number plates issued to the person, pursuant to
chapter 249, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. [L 2001, c 157, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next